pl: Norma zgodności płyty: Olimpijski (50 mm); Standardowy (25 mm); Standardowy (28 mm); Młodzieżowy/techniczny (22 mm); Inny
ru: Стандарт совместимости пластины: Олимпийский (50 мм); Стандартный (25 мм); Стандартный (28 мм); Юношеский/тренировочный (22 мм); Другое
zh-CN: 杠铃片兼容标准: 奥林匹克标准 (50 毫米); 标准 (25 毫米); 标准 (28 毫米); 青年/技巧训练 (22 毫米); 其他
fr: Norme de compatibilité des plaques: Olympique (50 mm); Standard (25 mm); Standard (28 mm); Jeunes/technique (22 mm); Autre
sl-SI: Standard združljivosti plošč: Olimpijski (50 mm); Standardni (25 mm); Standardni (28 mm); Mladinski/za tehniko (22 mm); Drugo
es: Estándar de compatibilidad de la placa: Olímpico (50 mm); Estándar (25 mm); Estándar (28 mm); Jóvenes/técnica (22 mm); Otro
de: Handelscheibenstandard: Olympisch (50 mm); Standard (25 mm); Standard (28 mm); Jugend/Technik (22 mm); Sonstige
tr: Plaka uyumluluk standardı: Olimpik (50 mm); Standart (25 mm); Standart (28 mm); Genç/teknik (22 mm); Diğer
ko: 플레이트 호환 규격: 올림픽(50mm); 표준(25mm); 표준(28mm); 유스/테크닉(22mm); 기타
hu: Lemez kompatibilitási szabvány: Olimpiai (50 mm); Normál (25 mm); Normál (28 mm); Ifjúsági/technikai (22 mm); Egyéb
lt-LT: Disko suderinamumo standartas: Olimpinis (50 mm); Standartinis (25 mm); Standartinis (28 mm); Jaunimo / technikos (22 mm); Kita
vi: Tiêu chuẩn tương thích của tấm đế: Olympic (50 mm); Tiêu chuẩn (25 mm); Tiêu chuẩn (28 mm); Trẻ em/kỹ thuật (22 mm); Khác
nl: Standaard plaatcompatibiliteit: Olympisch (50 mm); Standaard (25 mm); Standaard (28 mm); Jeugd/techniek (22 mm); Overig
fi: Levyn yhteensopivuusstandardi: Olympia (50 mm); Vakio (25 mm); Vakio (28 mm); Nuoriso/tekniikka (22 mm); Muu
bg-BG: Стандарт за съвместимост на плочата: Олимпийски (50 мм); Стандартни (25 мм); Стандартни (28 мм); За младежи/техника (22 мм); Друго
sk-SK: Norma kompatibility platní: Olympijské (50 mm); Štandardné (25 mm); Štandardné (28 mm); Mládežnícke/technické (22 mm); Iné
hr-HR: Standard kompatibilnosti ploče: Olimpijski standard (50 mm); Standardno (25 mm); Standardno (28 mm); Za mlade / trening tehnike (22 mm); Ostalo
it: Standard di compatibilità della piastra: Olimpionico (50 mm); Standard (25 mm); Standard (28 mm); Giovani/tecnica (22 mm); Altro
ro-RO: Standardul de compatibilitate al plăcii: Olimpic (50 mm); Standard (25 mm); Standard (28 mm); Tineret/tehnică (22 mm); Altele
en: Plate compatibility standard: Olympic (50 mm); Standard (25 mm); Standard (28 mm); Youth/technique (22 mm); Other
cs: Norma pro kompatibilitu desek: Olympijská (50 mm); Standardní (25 mm); Standardní (28 mm); Mládežnická/technická (22 mm); Jiné
da: Kompatibilitetsstandard for plade: Olympisk (50 mm); Standard (25 mm); Standard (28 mm); Unge/teknik (22 mm); Andet
pt-BR: Anilha, padrão de compatibilidade: Olímpico (50 mm); Padrão (25 mm); Padrão (28 mm); Juvenil/técnica (22 mm); Outro
sv: Kompatibilitetsstandard för tallrik: Olympisk (50 mm); Standard (25 mm); Standard (28 mm); Ungdom/teknik (22 mm); Övrigt
nb: Kompatibilitetsstandard for plate: Olympisk (50 mm); Standard (25 mm); Standard (28 mm); Ungdom/teknikk (22 mm); Annet
pt-PT: Norma de compatibilidade com discos: Olímpico (50 mm); Padrão (25 mm); Padrão (28 mm); Jovem/técnica (22 mm); Outro
zh-TW: 板材相容標準: 奧林匹克 (50 公釐); 標準 (25 公釐); 標準 (28 公釐); 青少年/技巧 (22 公釐); 其他
th: มาตรฐานความเข้ากันได้ของแผ่น: โอลิมปิก (50 มม.); มาตรฐาน (25 มม.); มาตรฐาน (28 มม.); เยาวชน/ฝึกเทคนิค (22 มม.); อื่นๆ
ja: プレート対応性標準: オリンピック (50 mm); スタンダード (25 mm); スタンダード (28 mm); ユース/テクニック (22 mm); その他
el: Τυποποιημένο σύστημα συμβατότητας πλακέτας: Ολυμπιακό (50 mm); Τυπικό (25 mm); Τυπικό (28 mm); Νέων/τεχνικής (22 mm); Άλλο